District of Columbia statutes.
10-1221.09

Financing Documents and Closing Documents.

(a)

The Mayor is authorized to prescribe the final form and content of all Financing Documents and all Closing Documents to which the District is a party that may be necessary or appropriate to issue, sell, and deliver the bonds.

(b)

The Mayor is authorized to execute, in the name of the District and on its behalf, the Financing Documents and any Closing Documents to which the District is a party by the Mayor’s manual or facsimile signature.

(c)

If required, the official seal of the District, or a facsimile of it, shall be impressed, printed, or otherwise reproduced on the bonds, the other Financing Documents, and the Closing Documents to which the District is a party.

(d)

Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2 and subchapter III-A of Chapter 3 of Title 47 shall not apply to the Financing Documents, Closing Documents, and any other contract the Mayor may from time to time enter into in connection with the Project.

Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 109, 53 DCR 5430
Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-144, § 2(e), 55 DCR 2527
D.C. Law 17-144 added subsec. (d).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 109 of New Convention Center Hotel Omnibus Financing and Development Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-404, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5404).